Hawaii statutes.
§831-4 Saving provisions. (a) This
chapter does not affect the power of a court, otherwise given by law to impose
sentence or to suspend imposition or execution of sentence on any conditions,
or to impose conditions of probation, or the power of the Hawaii paroling
authority to impose conditions of parole.

(b) This chapter does not deprive or restrict
the authority and powers of officials of a penal institution or other penal
facility, otherwise provided by law, for the administration of the institution
or facility or for the control of the conduct and conditions of confinement of
a convicted person in their custody.

(c) This chapter does not affect the
qualifications or disqualifications otherwise required or imposed by law for a
designated office, public or private, or to serve as a juror or to vote or for
any designated profession, trust, or position, or for any designated license or
privilege conferred by public authority.

(d) This chapter does not affect the rights of
others arising out of the conviction or out of the conduct on which the
conviction is based and not dependent upon the doctrines of civil death, the
loss of civil rights, the forfeiture of estate, or corruption of blood.

(e) This chapter does not affect laws
governing rights of inheritance of a murderer from the murderer's victim. [L
1969, c 250, pt of §1; HRS §716-4; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1976, c 92,
§8; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

For rights of inheritance of a murderer from the murderer's
victim, see §560:2-803.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next